Vermont statutes. Title 3 Executive
Chapter 3. Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs

§ 51.
Seal.

The Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs shall have a seal of office upon which shall be the words: EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT.
VERMONT.

§ 52.
Records.

The Secretary shall keep a full and complete record of official acts of the Executive Department in books to be furnished for that purpose and such record books, except those in actual use, shall be kept in the State House.

§ 53.
Copies.

The Secretary shall make copies of records in his or her office, attested under his or her seal, for the fees provided by law, and full faith and credit shall be given to such copies.

§ 54.
Repealed.
1979, No. 200 (Adj. Sess.), § 120.